Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-212
County seat; lots; sale; fund; how used.

The proceeds of the sale of such lots, after deducting all necessary expenses, shall be paid into the county treasury and constitute a fund for the erection of public buildings for the use of the county at the county seat, and shall be used for no other purpose whatever.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 89, p. 230;

R.S.1913, § 923;

C.S.1922, § 829;

C.S.1929, § 25-212;

R.S.1943, § 22-212.